test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-hingaemae63_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - hingämä: # Verb (63) '/(eng) to  /(fin) ' - partial paradigm
     hingämä+V+Inf/mA: hingämä
     hingämä+V+Inf: hingädäq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: hingä
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [hingät, hingädeq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: hingäs
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: hingämiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: hingätiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: hingäseq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: hingä
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg1: hingädä
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg2: [hingätät, hingätädeq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: hingätäs
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl1: hingätämiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl2: hingätätiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3: hingätäseq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prs+Oc+ConNeg: hingädä

     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [hingsi, hingässi]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [hingsit, hingsiq, hingsideq, hingässit, hingässiq, hingässideq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: hingäsʼ
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [hingsimiq, hingässimiq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [hingsitiq, hingässitiq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [hingsiq, hingsiväq, hingässiq, hingässiväq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: hingä
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg1: hingädi
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg2: [hingätit, hingädiq, hingätideq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3: hingäti
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl1: hingätimiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl2: hingätitiq
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3: [hingädiq, hingätiväq]
     hingämä+V+Ind+Prt+Oc+ConNeg: hingädä

     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hingäv
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: hingävä
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: hingävät
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: hingävähe
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hingäväq
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: hingävide
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: hingävit
     hingämä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: hingävihe
                    
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hingätäv
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: hingätävä
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: hingätävät
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: hingätävähe
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hingätäväq
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: hingätävide
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: hingätävit
     hingämä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: hingätävihe

     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: hingänüq
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: hingänü
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Par: hingänüt
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: hingänühe
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: hingänüq
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingänüide, hingänüisi]
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [hingänüid, hingänüisi]
     hingämä+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingänüihe, hingänüisihe]

     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: [hingät, hingätü]
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: hingädü
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Par: hingätüt
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: hingätühe
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: hingädüq
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingätüide, hingätüisi]
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [hingätüid, hingätüisi]
     hingämä+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingätüihe, hingätüisihe]
